Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1251 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Efficient
Parking Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1252 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Disability parking" means a parking space reserved for
persons with disabilities or veterans who have a handicapped
registration plate or placard;
Req. No. 10331 Page 1

2. "Minimum Parking Mandate" means a law, rule, or ordinance
that specifies a number of off-street parking spaces; and
3. "Political Subdivision" means a city, incorporated town, or
county within this state.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1253 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Notwithstanding any other statutory requirement or agency
rule, a political subdivision shall not impose minimum parking
mandates for residential, commercial, or industrial properties
within its jurisdiction.
B. This act does not prohibit a political subdivision from
passing an ordinance or enforcing laws related to disability parking
spaces.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10331 MJ 12/17/24







Req. No. 10331 Page 2